Washington statutes.
RCW 18.47.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Birth doula" means a person that is a nonmedical birth coach or support person trained to provide physical, emotional, and informational support to birthing persons during pregnancy, antepartum, labor, birth, and the postpartum period. Birth doulas advocate for and support birthing people and families to self-advocate by helping them to know their rights and make informed decisions. Birth doulas do not provide medical care.

(3) "Postpartum period" means the 12-month period beginning on the last day of the pregnancy.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 2022 c 217 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 217 ss 1-5: "Sections 1 through 5 of this act take effect October 1, 2023." [ 2022 c 217 s 8.]